Nebraska, session 109, LB683.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB683 LB683
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-1315, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-1315 (1) The county assessor shall, after March 19 and on or
before June 1, implement adjustments to the real property assessment roll
for actions of the Tax Equalization and Review Commission, except
beginning January 1, 2014, in any county with a population of at least
one hundred fifty thousand inhabitants according to the most recent
federal decennial census, the adjustments shall be implemented after
March 25 and on or before June 1.
(2) On or before June 1, in addition to the notice of preliminary
valuation sent pursuant to section 77-1301, the county assessor shall
create a notice to be delivered to notify the owner of record as of May
20 of the assessed value of every item of real property not exempt from
taxation which has been assessed at a value different than in the
previous year. Each county assessor shall transmit such notices to the
Department of Administrative Services for printing by the state. Such
notice shall be delivered given by first-class mail addressed to such
owner's last-known address. It shall identify the item of real property
and display a column for the prior tax year and the current tax year.
Under the column for the prior tax year, the notice shall display the
valuation of the parcel in the prior year and the amount each political
subdivision levied against such parcel in the prior year. Under the
column for the current tax year, the notice shall display the valuation
of the parcel in the current year and the time and place when each
political subdivision levying a tax against the parcel is convening the
budget hearing of each political subdivision. The notice shall state the
following, in a font size larger than any other font appearing on the
notice: "KNOW YOUR RIGHTS: If you believe the valuation of the parcel
described in this notice to be in error, you may file a protest of this
valuation with the county clerk on or before June 30, and your protest
shall be heard and decided by the county board of equalization. If you
-2-

LB683 LB683
2025 2025
are concerned about the effect your valuation may have on how much tax
will be levied against your parcel, you are encouraged to attend any and
all of the budget hearings for the above-listed political subdivisions.
Please be advised that the same levy rate from the prior year applied to
an increased valuation in the current year will result in a higher levy
of taxes; a levy rate higher than the prior year applied to the same
valuation in the current year will also result in a higher levy of
taxes." The notice shall also state state the old and new valuation, the
date of convening of the county board of equalization , and the dates for
filing a protest. The notice shall also state the following: "The time
and place of the budget hearings have been reported to the county
assessor by each political subdivision. Such time and place can change
based on unforeseen circumstances. You are encouraged to verify with each
political subdivision that the time and place of the budget hearings has
not changed."
(3) Immediately upon completion of the assessment roll, the county
assessor shall cause to be published in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county a certification that the assessment roll is
complete and notices of valuation changes have been mailed and provide
the final date for filing valuation protests with the county board of
equalization.
(4) The county assessor shall annually, on or before June 6, post in
his or her office and, as designated by the county board, mail to a
newspaper of general circulation and to licensed broadcast media in the
county the assessment ratios as found in his or her county as determined
by the Tax Equalization and Review Commission and any other statistical
measures, including, but not limited to, the assessment-to-sales ratio,
the coefficient of dispersion, and the price-related differential.
(5) On or before May 15, each political subdivision levying a tax
against property shall inform the county assessor of every county in
which the political subdivision has the authority to levy a tax against
-3-

LB683 LB683
2025 2025
property of the time and place such political subdivision's budget
hearing will convene.
Sec. 2. Section 77-1601, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-1601 (1) The county board of equalization shall each year, on or
before October 20, levy the necessary taxes for the current year if
within the limit of the law. The levy shall include an amount for
operation of all functions of county government and shall also include
all levies necessary to fund tax requests that are authorized as provided
in sections 77-3442 to 77-3444, including requests certified under
section 77-1632 the Property Tax Request Act.
(2) On or before November 5, the county board of equalization upon
its own motion may act to correct a clerical error which has resulted in
the calculation of an incorrect levy by any entity with a tax request as
provided in sections 77-3442 to 77-3444, including requests certified
under section 77-1632 the Property Tax Request Act. The county board of
equalization shall hold a public hearing to determine what adjustment to
the levy is proper, legal, or necessary. Notice shall be provided to the
governing body of each political subdivision affected by the error.
Notice of the hearing as required by section 84-1411 shall include the
following: (a) The time and place of the hearing, (b) the dollar amount
at issue, and (c) a statement setting forth the nature of the error.
(3) Upon the conclusion of the hearing, the county board of
equalization shall issue a corrected levy if it determines that an error
was made in the original levy which warrants correction. The county board
of equalization shall then order (a) the county assessor, county clerk,
and county treasurer to revise assessment books, unit valuation ledgers,
tax statements, and any other tax records to reflect the correction made
and (b) the recertification of the information provided to the Property
Tax Administrator pursuant to section 77-1613.01.
Sec. 3. Section 77-1632, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
-4-

LB683 LB683
2025 2025
2024, is amended to read:
77-1632 (1) For purposes of this section, property tax request means
the total amount of property taxes requested to be raised for a political
subdivision through the levy imposed pursuant to section 77-1601.
(2) (1) If the annual assessment of property would result in an
increase in the total property taxes levied by a county, city, village,
school district, learning community, sanitary and improvement district,
natural resources district, educational service unit, or community
college, as determined using the previous year's rate of levy, such
political subdivision's property tax request for the current year shall
be no more than its property tax request in the prior year, and the
political subdivision's rate of levy for the current year shall be
decreased accordingly when such rate is set by the county board of
equalization pursuant to section 77-1601. The governing body of the
political subdivision shall pass a resolution or ordinance to set the
amount of its property tax request after holding the public hearing
required in subsection (4) (3) of this section. If the governing body of
a political subdivision seeks to set its property tax request at an
amount that exceeds its property tax request in the prior year, it may do
so, subject to the limitations provided in the School District Property
Tax Limitation Act and the Property Tax Growth Limitation Act, after
holding the public hearing required in subsection (4) (3) of this section
and by passing a resolution or ordinance that complies with subsection
(5) (4) of this section. If any county, city, school district, or
community college seeks to increase its property tax request by more than
the allowable growth percentage, such political subdivision shall comply
with the requirements of section 77-1633 in lieu of the requirements in
subsections (3) and (4) of this section.
(3) (2) If the annual assessment of property would result in no
change or a decrease in the total property taxes levied by a county,
city, village, school district, learning community, sanitary and
-5-

LB683 LB683
2025 2025
improvement district, natural resources district, educational service
unit, or community college, as determined using the previous year's rate
of levy, such political subdivision's property tax request for the
current year shall be no more than its property tax request in the prior
year, and the political subdivision's rate of levy for the current year
shall be adjusted accordingly when such rate is set by the county board
of equalization pursuant to section 77-1601. The governing body of the
political subdivision shall pass a resolution or ordinance to set the
amount of its property tax request after holding the public hearing
required in subsection (4) (3) of this section. If the governing body of
a political subdivision seeks to set its property tax request at an
amount that exceeds its property tax request in the prior year, it may do
so, subject to the limitations provided in the School District Property
Tax Limitation Act and the Property Tax Growth Limitation Act, after
holding the public hearing required in subsection (4) (3) of this section
and by passing a resolution or ordinance that complies with subsection
(5) (4) of this section. If any county, city, school district, or
community college seeks to increase its property tax request by more than
the allowable growth percentage, such political subdivision shall comply
with the requirements of section 77-1633 in lieu of the requirements in
subsections (3) and (4) of this section.
(4) (3) The resolution or ordinance required under this section
shall only be passed after a special public hearing called for such
purpose is held and after notice is published in a newspaper of general
circulation in the area of the political subdivision at least four
calendar days prior to the hearing. For purposes of such notice, the four
calendar days shall include the day of publication but not the day of
hearing. If the political subdivision's total operating budget, not
including reserves, does not exceed ten thousand dollars per year or
twenty thousand dollars per biennial period, the notice may be posted at
the governing body's principal headquarters. The hearing notice shall
-6-

LB683 LB683
2025 2025
contain the following information: The certified taxable valuation under
section 13-509 for the prior year, the certified taxable valuation under
section 13-509 for the current year, and the percentage increase or
decrease in such valuations from the prior year to the current year; the
dollar amount of the prior year's tax request and the property tax rate
that was necessary to fund that tax request; the property tax rate that
would be necessary to fund last year's tax request if applied to the
current year's valuation; the proposed dollar amount of the tax request
for the current year and the property tax rate that will be necessary to
fund that tax request; the percentage increase or decrease in the
property tax rate from the prior year to the current year; and the
percentage increase or decrease in the total operating budget from the
prior year to the current year.
(5) (4) Any resolution or ordinance setting a political
subdivision's property tax request under this section at an amount that
exceeds the political subdivision's property tax request in the prior
year shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:
(a) The name of the political subdivision;
(b) The amount of the property tax request;
(c) The following statements:
(i) The total assessed value of property differs from last year's
total assessed value by ..... percent;
(ii) The tax rate which would levy the same amount of property taxes
as last year, when multiplied by the new total assessed value of
property, would be $..... per $100 of assessed value;
(iii) The (name of political subdivision) proposes to adopt a
property tax request that will cause its tax rate to be $..... per $100
of assessed value; and
(iv) Based on the proposed property tax request and changes in other
revenue, the total operating budget of (name of political subdivision)
will (increase or decrease) last year's budget by ..... percent; and
-7-

LB683 LB683
2025 2025
(d) The record vote of the governing body in passing such resolution
or ordinance.
(6) (5) Any resolution or ordinance setting a property tax request
under this section shall be certified and forwarded to the county clerk
on or before October 15 of the year for which the tax request is to
apply.
Sec. 4. Section 77-1776, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-1776 Any political subdivision which has received proceeds from a
levy imposed on all taxable property within an entire county which is in
excess of that requested by the political subdivision under section
77-1632 the Property Tax Request Act as a result of a clerical error or
mistake shall, in the fiscal year following receipt, return the excess
tax collections, net of the collection fee, to the county. By July 31 of
the fiscal year following the receipt of any excess tax collections, the
county treasurer shall certify to the political subdivision the amount to
be returned. For fiscal years beginning prior to July 1, 2025, such
excess tax collections shall be restricted funds in the budget of the
county that receives the funds under section 13-518.
Sec. 5. Original section 77-1315, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and sections 77-1601, 77-1632, and 77-1776, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 6. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
77-1630, 77-1631, 77-1633, and 77-1634, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024.
-8-